english.foma
### english.foma ###

# Vowels
define Vowel [ a | e | i | o | u ];
# Consonants
define Cons [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z ];
# Decimal Numbers
define decimals [ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ];

define PotentialWord [Cons|Vowel]+;
define PotentialDecimalNumber [decimals]+;

define ToUpCase a -> A || .#. _ ,,
                b -> B || .#. _ ,,
                c -> C || .#. _ ,,
                d -> D || .#. _ ,,
                e -> E || .#. _ ,,
                f -> F || .#. _ ,,
                g -> G || .#. _ ,,
                h -> H || .#. _ ,,
                i -> I || .#. _ ,,
                j -> J || .#. _ ,,
                k -> K || .#. _ ,,
                l -> L || .#. _ ,,
                m -> M || .#. _ ,,
                n -> N || .#. _ ,,
                o -> O || .#. _ ,,
                p -> P || .#. _ ,,
                q -> Q || .#. _ ,,
                r -> R || .#. _ ,,
                s -> S || .#. _ ,,
                t -> T || .#. _ ,,
                u -> U || .#. _ ,,
                v -> V || .#. _ ,,
                w -> W || .#. _ ,,
                x -> X || .#. _ ,,
                y -> Y || .#. _ ,,
                z -> Z || .#. _ ;

# Consonant doubling: 1-letter consonant doubled before -er/-est (happier/happiest)
define AConsonantDoubling b -> b b , c -> c c , d -> d d , f -> f f , g -> g g , h -> h h , j -> j j , k -> k k , l -> l l , m -> m m , n -> n n , p -> p p , q -> q q , r -> r r , s -> s s , t -> t t , v -> v v , x -> x x , z -> z z || _ "^" [ e r | e s t ];

# Consonant doubling: 1-letter consonant doubled before -ing/-ed (beg/begging)
define VConsonantDoubling b -> b b , c -> c c , d -> d d , f -> f f , g -> g g , h -> h h , j -> j j , k -> k k , l -> l l , m -> m m , n -> n n , p -> p p , q -> q q , r -> r r , s -> s s , t -> t t , v -> v v , x -> x x , z -> z z || _ "^" [ e d | i n g ];

# E deletion: silent e dropped before -ing and -ed (make/making)
define EDeletion e -> 0 || Cons Vowel _ "^" [ i n g | e d ] ,,  Cons Cons _ "^" [ i n g | e d ] ,,  Vowel Vowel _ "^" [ i n g | e d ] ,,  Vowel Cons _ "^" [ i n g | e d ];

# E insertion e added after -s, -z, -x, -ch, -sh before s (watch/watches)
define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;

# Y replacement: -y changes to -ie before -s, -i before -ed (try/tries) 
#define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s ; 
define YReplacement y -> i e || Cons _ "^" s    ,, 
                    y -> i   || _ "^" [ e d | e r | e s t ] ;

define YthReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" t h ;

# K insertion: verbs ending with vowel + -c add -k (panic/panicked)
define KInsertion [..] -> k || Vowel c _ "^" [e d | i n g];

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

def AddTag [..] -> "+swVowel+" || .#. _ Vowel ?* .#. .o. 
           [..] -> "+swConsonant+" || .#. _ Cons ?* .#. ;

read lexc engnoun.lexc
substitute defined PotentialWord for "[Guess]"
define LexiconN

define GrammarN LexiconN          .o.
                EInsertion        .o. 
                YReplacement      .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarNup LexiconN        .o.
                ToUpCase          .o.
                EInsertion        .o. 
                YReplacement      .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engadj.lexc
define LexiconA

define GrammarA LexiconA          .o. 
                YReplacement      .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarAup LexiconA        .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                YReplacement      .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engadj_cd.lexc
define LexiconAcd

define GrammarAcd LexiconAcd       .o. 
                AConsonantDoubling  .o. 
                YReplacement       .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarAcdup LexiconAcd    .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                AConsonantDoubling .o. 
                YReplacement      .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engadv.lexc
define LexiconAdv

define GrammarAdv LexiconAdv      .o. 
                YReplacement      .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarAdvup LexiconAdv    .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                YReplacement      .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engprep.lexc
define LexiconPrep

define GrammarPrep LexiconPrep    .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarPrepup LexiconPrep  .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engpart.lexc
define LexiconPart

define GrammarPart LexiconPart    .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarPartup LexiconPart  .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engpron.lexc
define LexiconPron

define GrammarPron LexiconPron    .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarPronup LexiconPron  .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engdet.lexc
define LexiconDet

define GrammarDet LexiconDet      .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarDetup LexiconDet    .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc enginject.lexc
define LexiconInject

define GrammarInject LexiconInject      .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarInjectup LexiconInject    .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engconj.lexc
define LexiconConj

define GrammarConj LexiconConj      .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarConjup LexiconConj    .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engnvc.lexc
define LexiconNVC

define GrammarNVC LexiconNVC      .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarNVCup LexiconNVC    .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engvvc.lexc
define LexiconVVC

define GrammarVVC LexiconVVC      .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarVVCup LexiconVVC    .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engcomp.lexc
define LexiconComp

define GrammarComp LexiconComp      .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarCompup LexiconComp    .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engpunct.lexc
define LexiconPunct

define GrammarPunct LexiconPunct      .o. 
                Cleanup;

define GrammarPunctup LexiconPunct    .o. 
                ToUpCase          .o. 
                Cleanup;

read lexc engverb_cd.lexc
define LexiconVcd

define GrammarVcd LexiconVcd     .o. 
               VConsonantDoubling .o. 
               EDeletion         .o. 
               EInsertion        .o. 
               YReplacement      .o. 
               KInsertion        .o. 
               Cleanup;

define GrammarVcdup LexiconVcd   .o. 
               ToUpCase          .o. 
               VConsonantDoubling .o. 
               EDeletion         .o. 
               EInsertion        .o. 
               YReplacement      .o. 
               KInsertion        .o. 
               Cleanup;

read lexc engverb.lexc
define LexiconV

define GrammarV LexiconV         .o. 
               EDeletion         .o. 
               EInsertion        .o. 
               YReplacement      .o. 
               KInsertion        .o. 
               Cleanup;

define GrammarVup LexiconV       .o. 
               ToUpCase          .o. 
               EDeletion         .o. 
               EInsertion        .o. 
               YReplacement      .o. 
               KInsertion        .o. 
               Cleanup;

read lexc engnum.lexc
define	LexiconNum

define GrammarNum LexiconNum     .o.
				  YthReplacement .o.
				  Cleanup;

define GrammarNumup LexiconNum     .o.
					ToUpCase       .o.
					YthReplacement .o.
					Cleanup;

read lexc engdecnum.lexc
substitute defined PotentialDecimalNumber for "[GuessNum]"
define	LexiconDecNum

define GrammarDecNum LexiconDecNum;

regex [GrammarN.i .o. AddTag].i | [GrammarNup.i .o. AddTag].i | GrammarAcd | GrammarAcdup | GrammarA | GrammarAup | GrammarAdv | GrammarAdvup | GrammarPrep | GrammarPrepup | GrammarPart | GrammarPartup | GrammarPron | GrammarPronup | GrammarDet | GrammarDetup | GrammarInject | GrammarInjectup | GrammarConj | GrammarConjup | GrammarNVC | GrammarNVCup | GrammarVVC | GrammarVVCup | GrammarComp | GrammarCompup | GrammarPunct | GrammarPunctup | GrammarVcd | GrammarVcdup | GrammarV | GrammarVup | GrammarNum | GrammarNumup | GrammarDecNum;
